Utah statutes.
17B-2a-1009.   Limit on property tax authority -- Exceptions.

(1)  As used in this section, "elected official" means a water conservancy district board of trustee member who:

(a)  is elected to the board of trustees by water conservancy district voters at an election held for that purpose;

(b)  holds, at the time of appointment to the board of trustees, an elected position with a municipality, county, or local district that is partially or completely included within the boundaries of the water conservancy district; or

(c)  is appointed in accordance with Subsection 17B-1-303(5) or 17B-1-306(4)(f) or (g).

(2)  The board of trustees of a water conservancy district may not collect property tax revenue in a tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, that would exceed the certified tax rate under Section 59-2-924 unless:

(a)  the members of the board of trustees are all elected officials;

(b)  the majority of the board of trustees are elected officials; or

(c)  the proposed tax levy has previously been approved by:

(i)  a majority of the water conservancy district voters at an election held for that purpose; or

(ii)  for a district described in Subsection 17B-2a-1005(2)(b), the appointing authority.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 2010 General Session

